Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2420
Board of Medicine and Surgery; duties.

The Board of Medicine and Surgery shall adopt policies and guidelines for the treatment of pain to ensure that physicians who are engaged in the appropriate treatment of pain are not subject to disciplinary action, and the board shall consider policies and guidelines developed by national organizations with expertise in pain management for this purpose.

Laws 1999, LB 226, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1198.